North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22J. The Voter-Owned Elections Act.

§§ 22J through 163-278.99D.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), as amended by Session Laws 2014-111, s. 8, effective July 1, 2013.

History.
S. 163-278.95; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.96; 2007-484, s. 43.8(a), (c); 2007-540, s. 1; 2010-170, s. 13; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b),
effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.97; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.98; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective
July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.99: 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.99A; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; 2008-150, s. 10.2(b); 2009-570, s. 26; repealed by 2013-381,
s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.99B; 2007-484, s. 43.8(b)-(d); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.99C; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s.
38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.99D; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 38.1(b), effective July 1, 2013; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a).

§ 163-278.99E.
(See Editor’s note for contingent repeal) Voter education.

Relationship to the Judicial Voter Guide. — The State Board may publish the Voter Guide in conjunction with the Judicial Voter Guide described in

G.S. 163-278.69

.

History.
2007-391, s. 4(b); 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-540, s. 1; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-360, s. 21.1(i); 2013-381, s. 38.1(l); 2014-111, s. 8; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).